Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.888

Catalytic converter inspections. (Effective April 1, 2025.)

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the Washington state patrol shall:

(1) Conduct periodic inspections at least once a year of all licensed purchasers of catalytic converters that have been removed from vehicles that are licensed under chapter 46.79 or 46.80 RCW;

(2) Develop a standardized inspection form and train local law enforcement agencies, civilian employees, and limited authority law enforcement personnel on inspection procedures of licensed purchasers;

(3) Specify which specific law enforcement agencies have a duty to inspect the different business types that are licensed to purchase catalytic converters; and

(4) Authorize inspections to be conducted by civilian employees or limited authority law enforcement agencies if necessary to increase the availability of potential inspectors, provided that the Washington state patrol shall retain oversight of such inspections.

[ 2024 c 301 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2024 c 301: See notes following RCW 9A.82.180.